Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-316
Act, how cited.

Sections 86-316 to 86-329 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund Act.

Laws 1997, LB 686, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 514, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1401;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 194;

Laws 2007, LB661, § 4;

Laws 2018, LB157, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB338, § 3.